Utah statutes.
11-39-104.   Exceptions.

(1)  The requirements of Section 11-39-103 do not apply to:

(a)  emergency repairs;

(b)  a building improvement or public works project if the estimated cost under Section 11-39-102 is less than the bid limit; or

(c)  the conduct or management of any of the departments, business, or property of the local entity.

(2)  This section may not be construed to limit the application of Section 72-6-108 to an improvement project, as defined in Section 72-6-109, that would otherwise be subject to Section 72-6-108.

(3)  This part applies to a building improvement or public works project of a special service district only to the extent that the contract for the building improvement or public works project is in a class of contract designated under Section 17D-1-107 as subject to this part.

